Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.250

Washington professional educator standards board—Professional certification—Rules.

The agency responsible for educator certification shall adopt rules for professional certification that:

(1) Grant professional certification to any teacher who attains certification from the national board for professional teaching standards; [and]

(2) Identify an expedited professional certification process for out-of-state teachers who have five years or more of successful teaching experience, including a method to determine the comparability of rigor between the Washington professional certification process and the advanced level teacher certification process of other states. A professional certificate must be issued to these experienced out-of-state teachers if the teacher holds: (a) A valid teaching certificate issued by the national board for professional teaching standards; or (b) an advanced level teacher certificate from another state that has been determined to be comparable to the Washington professional certificate.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 26 s 3; 2016 c 233 s 4; 2005 c 498 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 26: See note following RCW 28A.410.210.

Intent—2005 c 498: "The legislature recognizes the importance of ongoing professional development and growth for teachers with the goal of improving student achievement. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that professional certification is administered in such a way as to ensure that the professional development and growth of individual teachers is directly aligned to their current and future teaching responsibilities as professional educators." [ 2005 c 498 s 1.]